Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.250

Limitation on real estate auctions.

Auctioneers and auction companies may call for bids on real estate but only persons licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW may perform activities regulated under that chapter.

[ 1986 c 324 s 23.]